Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-603
Vital statistics; duties of department; rules and regulations.

The department shall provide for the registration of vital events and shall adopt, promulgate, and enforce such rules and regulations as are necessary to carry out the purposes of the Vital Statistics Act.

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. VI, art. II, div. IX, § 1, p. 781;

C.S.1922, § 8228;

Laws 1927, c. 166, § 1, p. 448;

C.S.1929, § 71-2401;

R.S.1943, § 71-601;

Laws 1965, c. 418, § 1, p. 1335;

Laws 1991, LB 703, § 27;

Laws 1994, LB 886, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 511;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-601;

Laws 2005, LB 301, § 23.